New Jersey, session 222, S3566.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  A taxpayer who is employed as an eligible educator or a paraprofessional, and is a full-time employee, shall be allowed a deduction of $500 from the taxpayers gross income for the taxable year. b.  A taxpayer who is employed as an eligible educator or a paraprofessional, but is not a full-time employee, shall be allowed a deduction of $350 from the taxpayers gross income for the taxable year. c.  As used in this section: Eligible educator means an individual who is employed full-time as a teacher in a school district, charter school, renaissance school project, approved private school for students with disabilities, or nonpublic school in this State. Full-time employee means an employee who meets the minimum hours required for full time-status, as determined by their employer, provided that the minimum number hours shall be at least 25 hours per week, or more, if required by contract or resolution. Employment shall also be for 12 months per year except for employees whose usual work schedule is 10 months per year, which is the standard school year. Paraprofessional means an individual who is employed in a school district, charter school, renaissance school project, approved private school for students with disabilities, or nonpublic school in this State as a school aide or classroom aide who assists a teaching staff member with the supervision of pupil activities. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following enactment.